California, session 20252026, SB1293.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 125.5 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:125.5. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Affected resident” means a person who resides in, or a business that is located within, 10 five miles of the project limits. limits, as determined by the department.(2) “Rural project” means any construction or maintenance project that meets both of the following:(A) Is planned to be performed within the right-of-way of a state highway in a county with a population of 250,000 60,000 people or fewer.(B) Is scheduled to include a lane closure or a road closure for 14 days or more. either of the following durations:(i) Seven days or more if there is no alternate route available.(ii) Fourteen days or more if an alternate route is available.(b) The department shall provide written notice of a rural project to an affected resident at least 14 days before the start of the rural project. the construction or maintenance of a rural project begins. The notice shall describe the nature of the rural project, including, but not limited to, any planned closures and traffic detours. closures, traffic detours, and appropriate contact information for the department or contractor. The department shall also post the notice on its internet website.